Utah statutes.
59-7-522.   Overpayments.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a claim for credit or refund of an
overpayment that is attributable to a Utah net loss carry back or carry
forward shall be filed within three years from the due date of the return for
the taxable year of the Utah net loss.
(b)  The three-year period described in Subsection (1)(a) shall be extended by
any extension of time provided in statute for filing the return described in
Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  If an overpayment relates to a change in or correction of federal taxable
income described in Section 59-7-519, a credit may be allowed or a refund paid
any time before the expiration of the period within which a deficiency may be
assessed.
(3)  The commission shall make a credit or refund within a 30-day period after
the day on which a court's decision to require the commission to credit or
refund the amount of an overpayment to a taxpayer is final.
